Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
652

GARNISHMENT

Section

652-1 Garnishee process; "garnishee
fund"

652-1.5 Prejudgment garnishment; procedures

652-2 Garnishee, rights, duties; collection by sheriff,

deputy sheriff, police officer, or
independent civil

process server

652-2.5 Service on garnishee

652-2.6 Effect of service

652-3 Amount withheld

652-4 Satisfying judgment

652-5 Successive sequestration of wages, upon
change of

employment

652-6 Same

652-7 Successive actions; procedure

652-8 Execution, when

652-9 Garnishee may be heard on notice to
plaintiff

652-10 Debts payable in future

652-11 Section 652-9 to appear on summons

652-12 Payment by garnishee, effect

652-13, 14 Repealed

652-15 Law applicable to all courts

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of
court, see note preceding Title 32.

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 64, 69; DCRCP rules 64, 69. Service, see HRCP
rule 4; DCRCP rule 4.

Case Notes

Validity of prejudgment replevin provisions authorizing
taking of property without affording prior opportunity to be heard. 407 U.S.
67 (1972).

Pledgor's interest in pledged stock, though subject to bank's
security interest, was garnishable under this chapter. 92 H. 347, 992 P.2d 42
(2000).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next